Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.480

Emergency medical personnel—Futile treatment and natural death directives—Guidelines.

The department of health shall adopt guidelines and protocols for how emergency medical personnel shall respond when summoned to the site of an injury or illness for the treatment of a person who has signed a written directive or durable power of attorney requesting that he or she not receive futile emergency medical treatment.

The guidelines shall include development of a simple form that shall be used statewide.

[ 2000 c 70 s 1; 1992 c 98 s 14.]

NOTES:

Application—1992 c 98: See RCW 70.122.915.